Tennessee, session 114, SB0677.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 1, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The department shall provide at least one (1) professional development
course for teachers that provides asynchronous instruction on the use of artificial
intelligence in the classroom; that is made available, at no cost, to teachers in grades six
through twelve (6-12); and that may be used by teachers to earn professional
development points. The course content must be created by an entity with experience in
a related subject area, such as computer science or another science, technology,
engineering, and mathematics (STEM) field.
(b) By August 1, 2027, or within two (2) years of becoming licensed as a teacher
in this state, whichever is later, teachers in grades six through twelve (6-12) must
complete at least one (1) professional development course approved by the department
that provides asynchronous instruction on the use of artificial intelligence in the
classroom. Each LEA and public charter school shall approve professional development
points, pursuant to the state board of education's educator licensure policies and rules,
for a teacher's completion of at least one (1) department-approved artificial intelligence
training.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0677
002134
- 1 -